Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2918
Signing and filing of records pursuant to judicial order.

(1) If a person required by the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act to sign or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing does not do so, any other aggrieved person may petition the district court of Lancaster County to order:

(a) The person to sign the record and the person to deliver the record to the Secretary of State for filing; or

(b) The Secretary of State to file the record unsigned.

(2) If an aggrieved person under subsection (1) of this section is not the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association to which the record pertains, the aggrieved person shall make the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association a party to the action. An aggrieved person under subsection (1) of this section may seek any or all of the remedies provided in such subsection in the same action.

(3) A record filed unsigned pursuant to this section is effective without being signed.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 18.